Utah statutes.
76-10-1504.   Bus hijacking -- Assault with intent to commit hijacking -- Use of a dangerous weapon or firearm -- Penalties.

(1) (a)  A person is guilty of bus hijacking if the person seizes or exercises control, by force or violence or threat of force or violence, of a bus within the state.

(b)  Bus hijacking is a first degree felony.

(2) (a)  A person is guilty of assault with the intent to commit bus hijacking if the person intimidates, threatens, or commits assault or battery toward a driver, attendant, guard, or any other person in control of a bus so as to interfere with the performance of duties by the person.

(b)  Assault with the intent to commit bus hijacking is a second degree felony.

(3)  A person who, in the commission of assault with intent to commit bus hijacking, uses a dangerous weapon, as defined in Section 76-1-601, is guilty of a first degree felony.

(4) (a)  A person who boards a bus with a concealed dangerous weapon or firearm upon his person or effects is guilty of a third degree felony.

(b)  The prohibition of Subsection (4)(a) does not apply to:

(i)  individuals listed in Subsections 76-10-523(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), and (e);

(ii)  a person licensed to carry a concealed weapon; or

(iii)  persons in possession of weapons or firearms with the consent of the owner of the bus or the owner's agent, or the lessee or bailee of the bus.

